North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-20.2 Juvenile Court Act

Source:

S.L. 2021, hb1035, § 22, effective August 1, 2021.

27-20.2-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Abandon” means:

As to a parent of a child not in the custody of that parent, failure by the noncustodial parent significantly without justifiable cause:

To communicate with the child; or

To provide for the care and support of the child as required by law; or

As to a parent of a child in that parent’s custody:

To leave the child for an indefinite period without making firm and agreed plans, with the child’s immediate caregiver, for the parent’s resumption of physical custody;

Following the child’s birth or treatment at a hospital, to fail to arrange for the child’s discharge within ten days after the child no longer requires hospital care; or

Willfully fail to furnish food, shelter, clothing, or medical attention reasonably sufficient to meet the child’s needs.

“Abandoned infant” means a child who has been abandoned before reaching the age of one year.

“Child” means an individual who is:

Under the age of eighteen years and is not married; or

Under the age of twenty years with respect to a delinquent act committed while under the age of eighteen years and not married.

“Child in need of protection” means a child who:

Is without proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals, and the need for services or protection is not due primarily to the lack of financial means of the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;

Has been abandoned by the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Is without proper parental care, control, or education as required by law, or other care and control necessary for the child’s well-being because of the physical, mental, emotional, or other illness or disability of the child’s parent or parents, and that such lack of care is not due to a willful act of commission or act of omission by the child’s parents, and care is requested by a parent;

Is in need of treatment and whose parents, guardian, or other custodian have refused to participate in treatment as ordered by the juvenile court;

Was subject to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner;

Is present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure to a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2; or

Is a victim of human trafficking as defined in title 12.1.

“Child in need of services” means a child who in any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation:

Is habitually and without justification truant from school subject to compulsory school attendance and is absent from school without an authorized excuse more than three days during a school year;

Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child’s parent, guardian, or other custodian, including running away, and is ungovernable or who is willfully in a situation dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or others;

Has committed an offense applicable only to a child, except for an offense committed by a minor fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an equivalent local ordinance or resolution; or

Is under the age of fourteen years and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative nicotine product in violation of subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this subdivision, “electronic smoking device” and “alternative nicotine product” have the same meaning as in section 12.1-31-03; and

In any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Custodian” means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, which stands in loco parentis to the child and a person that has been given legal custody of the child by order of a court.

“Delinquent act” means an act designated a crime under the law, including local ordinances or resolutions of this state, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under federal law.

“Delinquent child” means a child who has committed a delinquent act and is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Director” means the director of juvenile court or the director’s designee.

“Diversion” means an intervention strategy that redirects a child away from formal processing in the juvenile justice system, while still holding the child accountable for that child’s actions.

“Facility” means buildings, structures, or systems, including those for essential administration and support, which are used to provide residential treatment for children.

“Host county” means the county within the human service zone in which the human service zone administrative office is located and in which the human service zone team members are employed.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department of human services.

“Juvenile court” means the district court of this state.

“Juvenile drug court” means a program established by the supreme court which is a post-petition or post-adjudication program aimed at intervening in substance use disorders through intense supervision and participation in recovery services.

“Proceeding” means any hearing conducted before a juvenile court or a referral for service.

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a licensed or approved residence providing an out-of-home treatment placement for children, including a trauma-informed model.

“Relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, half-sibling, aunt, great-aunt, uncle, great-uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child’s parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child’s community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child’s stepparent.

“Restorative justice” means a system of justice which focuses on the rehabilitation of offenders through reconciliation with victims and the community at large.

“Shelter care” means temporary care of a child in physically unrestricted facilities.

“The court” means the district courts as designated by the North Dakota supreme court which includes juvenile court as a subset of district court.

“Willfully” has the meaning provided in section 12.1-02-02.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-01.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Abandon” means:

As to a parent of a child not in the custody of that parent, failure by the noncustodial parent significantly without justifiable cause:

To communicate with the child; or

To provide for the care and support of the child as required by law; or

As to a parent of a child in that parent’s custody:

To leave the child for an indefinite period without making firm and agreed plans, with the child’s immediate caregiver, for the parent’s resumption of physical custody;

Following the child’s birth or treatment at a hospital, to fail to arrange for the child’s discharge within ten days after the child no longer requires hospital care; or

Willfully fail to furnish food, shelter, clothing, or medical attention reasonably sufficient to meet the child’s needs.

“Abandoned infant” means a child who has been abandoned before reaching the age of one year.

“Child” means an individual who is:

Under the age of eighteen years and is not married; or

Under the age of twenty years with respect to a delinquent act committed while under the age of eighteen years and not married.

“Child in need of protection” means a child who:

Is without proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law, or other care or control necessary for the child’s physical, mental, or emotional health, or morals, and the need for services or protection is not due primarily to the lack of financial means of the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;

Has been abandoned by the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian;

Is without proper parental care, control, or education as required by law, or other care and control necessary for the child’s well-being because of the physical, mental, emotional, or other illness or disability of the child’s parent or parents, and that such lack of care is not due to a willful act of commission or act of omission by the child’s parents, and care is requested by a parent;

Is in need of treatment and whose parents, guardian, or other custodian have refused to participate in treatment as ordered by the juvenile court;

Was subject to prenatal exposure to chronic or severe use of alcohol or any controlled substance as defined in chapter 19-03.1 in a manner not lawfully prescribed by a practitioner;

Is present in an environment subjecting the child to exposure to a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as prohibited by section 19-03.1-22.2; or

Is a victim of human trafficking as defined in title 12.1.

“Child in need of services” means a child who in any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation:

Is habitually and without justification truant from school subject to compulsory school attendance and is absent from school without an authorized excuse more than three days during a school year;

Is habitually disobedient of the reasonable and lawful commands of the child’s parent, guardian, or other custodian, including running away, and is ungovernable or who is willfully in a situation dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the child or others;

Has committed an offense applicable only to a child, except for an offense committed by a minor fourteen years of age or older under subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03 or an equivalent local ordinance or resolution; or

Is under the age of fourteen years and has purchased, possessed, smoked, or used tobacco, a tobacco-related product, an electronic smoking device, or an alternative nicotine product in violation of subsection 2 of section 12.1-31-03. As used in this subdivision, “electronic smoking device” and “alternative nicotine product” have the same meaning as in section 12.1-31-03; and

In any of the foregoing instances is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Custodian” means a person, other than a parent or legal guardian, which stands in loco parentis to the child and a person that has been given legal custody of the child by order of a court.

“Delinquent act” means an act designated a crime under the law, including local ordinances or resolutions of this state, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under federal law.

“Delinquent child” means a child who has committed a delinquent act and is in need of treatment or rehabilitation.

“Director” means the director of juvenile court or the director’s designee.

“Diversion” means an intervention strategy that redirects a child away from formal processing in the juvenile justice system, while still holding the child accountable for that child’s actions.

“Facility” means buildings, structures, or systems, including those for essential administration and support, which are used to provide residential treatment for children.

“Host county” means the county within the human service zone in which the human service zone administrative office is located and in which the human service zone team members are employed.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the department of health and human services.

“Juvenile court” means the district court of this state.

“Juvenile drug court” means a program established by the supreme court which is a post-petition or post-adjudication program aimed at intervening in substance use disorders through intense supervision and participation in recovery services.

“Proceeding” means any hearing conducted before a juvenile court or a referral for service.

“Qualified residential treatment program” means a licensed or approved residence providing an out-of-home treatment placement for children, including a trauma-informed model.

“Relative” means:

The child’s grandparent, great-grandparent, sibling, half-sibling, aunt, great-aunt, uncle, great-uncle, nephew, niece, or first cousin;

An individual with a relationship to the child, derived through a current or former spouse of the child’s parent, similar to a relationship described in subdivision a;

An individual recognized in the child’s community as having a relationship with the child similar to a relationship described in subdivision a; or

The child’s stepparent.

“Restorative justice” means a system of justice which focuses on the rehabilitation of offenders through reconciliation with victims and the community at large.

“Shelter care” means temporary care of a child in physically unrestricted facilities.

“The court” means the district courts as designated by the North Dakota supreme court which includes juvenile court as a subset of district court.

“Willfully” has the meaning provided in section 12.1-02-02.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective September 1, 2022.

27-20.2-02.
Presumption of age.

In determining an individual’s age for purposes of this chapter, the individual’s date of birth as provided by any of the following is presumed to be the individual’s legal date of birth:

A state government in the form of a birth certificate, other state-issued identification, or a certified copy of a birth certificate that includes the individual’s date of birth.

The United States government in the form of a tribal identification document, military identification, passport, passport card, permanent resident card, certificate of United States citizenship, certificate of naturalization, border crossing card, visa, or other entry document that includes the individual’s date of birth.

A foreign government in the form of a passport, driver’s license, or other foreign government-issued identity document that includes the individual’s date of birth. If there is a conflict between government-issued forms, a government-issued birth certificate or a certified copy of a birth certificate takes precedence.

The presumption in subsection 1 may be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-03.
Jurisdiction.

The juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction of the following proceedings, which are governed by this chapter:

Proceedings in which a child is alleged to be delinquent, a child in need of services, or a child in need of services or protection under this chapter or chapter 27-20.4;

Proceedings for the termination of parental rights except if a part of an adoption proceeding under chapter 27-20.3;

Proceedings arising under section 27-20.3-16;

Civil forfeiture proceedings arising under chapter 19-03.1 or section 29-31.1-04 for which a child is alleged to have possessed forfeitable property. The juvenile court shall conduct the proceedings in accordance with the procedures provided for under sections 19-03.1-36 through 19-03.1-37; and

Proceedings for the guardianship of a child under chapter 27-20.1, except the testamentary appointment of a guardian for a minor governed by chapter 30.1-27.

The juvenile court also has exclusive original jurisdiction of the following proceedings, which are governed by the laws relating to those proceedings without regard to the other provisions of this chapter:

Proceedings to obtain judicial consent to the marriage, employment, or enlistment in the armed services of a child, if consent is required by law;

Proceedings under the interstate compact on juveniles;

Proceedings under the interstate compact on the placement of children; and

Proceedings arising under section 50-06-06.13 to obtain a judicial determination that the placement of a severely emotionally disturbed child in an out-of-home treatment program is in the best interests of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-04.
Juvenile court personnel.

The supreme court may provide for the appointment by administrative and personnel rules of the necessary juvenile court officers, clerical personnel, and other specialized personnel within the limits of legislative appropriations to assist the juvenile court in carrying out the juvenile probation and supervisor functions of the juvenile court.

Detention center facilities and personnel must be funded by the county.

All salaries, per diem, and other compensation payable to juvenile court personnel, all necessary books, forms, stationery, office supplies and equipment, postage, telephone, and travel, and other necessary expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter must be borne by the state, except for suitable quarters for conducting official business and lights and fuel which must be funded by the county and except as provided by subsection 1 of section 27-20.2-19.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-05.
Powers and duties of the director of juvenile court.

For the purpose of carrying out the objectives and purposes of this chapter and subject to the limitations of this chapter or imposed by the court, a director shall:

Make investigations, reports, and recommendations to the juvenile court.

Receive and examine referrals and charges of delinquency, a child in need of services, or a child in need of protection for the purpose of considering the commencement of proceedings under this chapter.

Make a determination upon intake of referrals regarding the appropriate manner to handle delinquent conduct, or a child in need of services or a child in need of protection by use of nonjudicial adjustments or formal court processes.

Supervise and assist a child placed on probation for delinquency or a child in need of services, or both.

Make appropriate referrals to other private or public agencies of the community if assistance of the agencies appears to be needed or desirable.

Issue a temporary custody order concerning a child who is referred to the director’s supervision or care as a delinquent or a child in need of services or protection. Except as provided by this chapter, a director does not have the powers of a law enforcement officer.

Take acknowledgments of instruments for the purpose of this chapter.

Make such temporary order not to exceed ninety-six hours for the custody and control of a child alleged to be in need of services or protection as may be deemed appropriate. The order must be reduced to writing within twenty-four hours, excluding holidays and weekends.

Perform all other functions designated by this chapter or under section 27-05-30 or by order of the court pursuant to such law, including, if qualified, the order of a referee.

Issue an order to a law enforcement authority to transport a child to and from a specified location.

Receive and examine requests for review of a child’s placement at a qualified residential treatment program under the federal Family First Prevention Services Act [Pub. L. 115-123; 132 Stat. 64; 42 U.S.C. 675].

Receive and examine petitions to establish, modify, or terminate a guardianship of a minor under chapter 27-20.1.

Any of the foregoing functions may be performed in another state if authorized by the court of this state and permitted by the laws of the other state.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-06.
Commencement of proceedings.

A proceeding under this chapter may be commenced:

By transfer of a case from another court as provided in section 27-20.2-07; or

In other cases by the filing of a petition as provided in this chapter. The petition and all other documents in the proceeding must be entitled “In the interest of _______________, a child”. If a child is in shelter care, the petition must be filed within thirty days of the shelter care, this is the date on which the child was removed both physically and legally from the parents, legal guardians, or custodians.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-07.
Transfer from other courts.

If it appears to the court in a criminal proceeding, except for an offense transferred under section 27-20.4-20, that the defendant is a child subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the court immediately shall transfer the case to the juvenile court together with a copy of the accusatory pleading and other papers, documents, and transcripts of testimony relating to the case. The court shall order that the defendant be taken immediately to the juvenile court or to a place of detention designated by the juvenile court, or release the defendant to the custody of the defendant’s parent, guardian, custodian, or other person legally responsible for the defendant, to be brought before the juvenile court at a time designated by that court. The accusatory pleading may serve in lieu of a petition in the juvenile court unless that court directs the filing of a petition.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-08.
Nonjudicial adjustment — Diversion.

Before an informal adjustment is held or a petition filed, the director of juvenile court or designee may impose requirements in lieu of further proceedings for the conduct and control of the child with a diversion.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-09.
Nonjudicial adjustment — Informal adjustment.

Before a petition is filed, the director of juvenile court or designee may give counsel and advice to the parties and impose conditions for the conduct and control of the child in lieu of further proceedings with a view to an informal adjustment if it appears:

The admitted facts bring the case within the jurisdiction of the court;

Information, advice, and conditions, if any, for the conduct and control of the child without an adjudication would be in the best interest of the public and the child; and

The child and the child’s parents, guardian, or other custodian consent to the counsel and advice with knowledge that consent is not obligatory.

If a victim is identified in the referral, the court must give reasonable written notice of the informal adjustment to the victim.

The giving of information and advice and any conditions imposed for the conduct and control of the child may not extend beyond six months from the day commenced unless extended by the court for an additional period not to exceed six months and does not authorize the detention of the child if not otherwise permitted by this chapter. If the child admits to driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 39-08-01 or an equivalent ordinance, the child may be required to pay a fine as a condition imposed under this section.

An incriminating statement made by a child to the juvenile court officer or designee giving information and advice incident to the giving of counsel and advice may not be used against the child over objection in any proceeding or as part of a risk and need screening or assessment process.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-10.
Venue.

Except as provided in sections 27-20.3-03 and 27-20.4-03, a proceeding in this chapter may be commenced in the county in which the child resides or the county in which the acts constituting the alleged conduct occurred.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-11.
Transfer to another juvenile court within the state.

If the child resides in a county of the state and the proceeding is commenced in a court of another county, the court, on motion of a party or on motion of the court made before final disposition and in consultation with the court in the other county, may transfer the proceeding to the county of the child’s residence for further action. Like transfer may be made if the residence of the child changes pending the proceeding. The proceeding must be transferred if the child has been adjudicated delinquent or a child in need of services and other proceedings involving the child are pending in the juvenile court of the county of the child’s residence.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-12.
Right to counsel.

Except as provided in section 27-20.1-09, a child alleged to be within the jurisdiction of the court in an action arising under chapters 27-20.1, 27-20.2, 27-20.3, and 27-20.4 has the right to be represented by counsel in all proceedings in which a petition has been filed. Counsel for the child must be appointed, regardless of income, unless counsel is retained for the juvenile, in any proceeding in which the juvenile is alleged to be:

Delinquent;

A child in need of services; or

A child in need of protection if the child is of sufficient age and competency to assist counsel.

A child may waive the right to counsel in a juvenile delinquency proceeding if the child, who is fourteen years of age or older and the court has determined the waiver is knowing, voluntary, and intelligent. The waiver must be made on the record. If a child waives counsel for a hearing, the child must be informed of the right to revoke the waiver and request counsel at all subsequent hearings.

The court shall require payment for reimbursement of counsel appointed pursuant to this section from a person that has legal care, custody, or control of the child. The court must include this finding in the findings of fact and order for disposition.

A child’s parent, legal guardian, or custodian is entitled to counsel upon the filing of an application for counsel and a determination of indigency. If a party appears without counsel, the court shall determine whether the party knows the party may be represented by counsel and that the party is entitled to counsel at public expense if indigent. The court may continue the proceeding to enable a party to obtain counsel. A child’s parent, legal guardian, or custodian determined to be indigent is entitled to counsel:

At a detention hearing;

At the dispositional stage of a juvenile delinquency matter;

At all proceedings in a child in need of services or protection; or

In a permanency or review of an order entered in any of the proceedings under subdivision a, b, or c.

The child may elect to be represented by counsel for a nonjudicial adjustment.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-13.
Other basic rights.

A party is entitled to the opportunity to introduce evidence and otherwise be heard in the party’s own behalf and to cross-examine adverse witnesses.

A child charged with a delinquent act need not be a witness against or otherwise incriminate oneself. An extrajudicial statement, if obtained in the course of violation of this chapter or which would be constitutionally inadmissible in a criminal proceeding, may not be used against a child. Evidence illegally seized or obtained may not be received over objection to establish the allegations made against a child. A confession validly made by a child out of court is insufficient to support an adjudication of delinquency unless the confession is corroborated in whole or in part by other evidence.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-14.
Orders directed to parents or guardians.

Every parent or guardian has an obligation and must participate in any treatment of the parent’s or guardian’s child as ordered by the juvenile court.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-15.
Indian child welfare — Active efforts and procedures.

As used in this section:

“Active efforts” means affirmative, active, thorough, and timely efforts intended primarily to maintain or reunite an Indian child with the child’s family. Active efforts are required if the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 [25 U.S.C. 1901 through 1963] applies or may apply, including during the verification process. If an agency is involved in the child-custody proceeding, active efforts must involve assisting the parent or parents or Indian custodian through the steps of a case plan and with accessing or developing the resources necessary to satisfy the case plan. To the maximum extent possible, active efforts should be provided in a manner consistent with the prevailing social and cultural conditions and way of life of the Indian child’s tribe and should be conducted in partnership with the Indian child and the Indian child’s parents, extended family members, Indian custodians, and tribe. Active efforts are to be tailored to the facts and circumstances of the case. The term includes:

Conducting a comprehensive assessment of the circumstances of the Indian child’s family, with a focus on safe reunification as the most desirable goal, with ongoing timely assessment to determine if the threat is resolved and placement of the child can be returned to the custodian;

Identifying appropriate services and helping the parents to overcome barriers, including actively assisting the parents in obtaining such services; (3) Identifying, notifying, and inviting representatives of the Indian child’s tribe to participate in providing support and services to the Indian child’s family and in family team meetings, permanency planning, and resolution of placement issues;

Identifying, notifying, and inviting representatives of the Indian child’s tribe to participate in providing support and services to the Indian child’s family and in family team meetings, permanency planning, and resolution of placement issues;

Conducting or causing to be conducted a diligent search for the Indian child’s extended family members, and contacting and consulting with extended family members to provide family structure and support for the Indian child and the Indian child’s parents;

Offering and employing available and culturally appropriate family preservation strategies and facilitating the use of remedial and rehabilitative services provided by the child’s tribe;

Taking steps to keep siblings together whenever possible;

Supporting regular visits with parents or Indian custodians in the most natural setting possible as well as trial home visits of the Indian child during any period of removal, consistent with the need to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the child;

Identifying community resources, including housing, financial, transportation, mental health, substance abuse, and peer support services and actively assisting the Indian child’s parents or, if appropriate, the child’s family, in utilizing and accessing those resources;

Monitoring progress and participation in services;

Considering alternative ways to address the needs of the Indian child’s parents and if appropriate, the family, if the optimum services do not exist or are not available; and

Providing post-reunification services and monitoring.

“Extended family member” means a relationship defined by the law or custom of the Indian child’s tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, means an individual who has reached the age of eighteen and who is the Indian child’s grandparent, aunt or uncle, brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or second cousin, or stepparent.

“Indian” means an individual who is a member of an Indian tribe, or who is a native and a member of a regional corporation as defined in 43 U.S.C. 1606.

“Indian child” means an unmarried individual who is under the age of eighteen and is either a member of an Indian tribe or is eligible for membership in an Indian tribe and is the biological child of a member of an Indian tribe.

“Indian child’s tribe” means the Indian tribe in which an Indian child is a member or eligible for membership or, in the case of an Indian child who is a member of or eligible for membership in more than one tribe, the Indian tribe with which the Indian child has the more significant contacts.

“Indian custodian” means any Indian individual who has legal custody of an Indian child under tribal law or custom or under state law or to whom temporary physical care, custody, and control has been transferred by the parent of the child.

“Indian tribe” means an Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized Indian group or community of Indians recognized as eligible for services provided to Indians by the United States secretary of the interior because of their status as Indians, including any Alaska native village as defined in 43 U.S.C. 1602(c).

“Parent” means any biological parent or parents of an Indian child or any Indian individual who has lawfully adopted an Indian child, including adoptions under tribal law or custom. The term does not include the unwed father if paternity has not been acknowledged or established.

“Termination of parental rights” means any action resulting in the termination of the parent-child relationship. The term does not include a placement based upon an act by an Indian child which, if committed by an adult, would be deemed a crime or a placement upon award of custody to one of the child’s parents in a divorce proceeding.

Before removal of an Indian child from the custody of a parent or Indian custodian for purposes of involuntary foster care placement or the termination of parental rights over an Indian child, the court shall find that active efforts have been made to provide remedial services and rehabilitative services designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family and that these efforts have proved unsuccessful. The court may not order the removal unless evidence of active efforts shows there has been a vigorous and concerted level of casework beyond the level that would constitute reasonable efforts under section 27-20.3-26. Reasonable efforts may not be construed to be active efforts. Active efforts must be made in a manner that takes into account the prevailing social and cultural values, conditions, and way of life of the Indian child’s tribe. Active efforts must utilize the available resources of the Indian child’s extended family, tribe, tribal and other relevant social service agencies, and individual Indian caregivers.

The court may order the removal of the Indian child for involuntary foster case placement only if the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage or harm to the child. Evidence must show a causal relationship between the particular conditions in the home and the likelihood that continued custody of the child will result in serious emotional or physical damage or harm to the particular child who is the subject of the proceeding. Poverty, isolation, custodian age, crowded or inadequate housing, substance use, or nonconforming social behavior does not by itself constitute clear and convincing evidence of imminent serious emotional or physical damage or harm to the child. As soon as the threat has been removed and the child is no longer at risk, the state should terminate the removal, by returning the child to the parent while offering a solution to mitigate the situation that gave rise to the need for emergency removal and placement.

The court may only order the termination of parental rights over the Indian child if the court determines, by evidence beyond a reasonable doubt, that continued custody of the child by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage or harm to the child.

In considering whether to involuntarily place an Indian child in foster care or to terminate the parental rights of the parent of an Indian child, the court shall require that a qualified expert witness must be qualified to testify regarding whether the child’s continued custody by the parent or Indian custodian is likely to result in serious emotional or physical damage or harm to the child and should be qualified to testify as to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe. An individual may be designated by the Indian child’s tribe as being qualified to testify to the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child’s tribe. The court or any party may request the assistance of the Indian child’s tribe or the bureau of Indian affairs office serving the Indian child’s tribe in locating individuals qualified to serve as expert witnesses. The social worker regularly assigned to the Indian child may not serve as a qualified expert witness in child-custody proceedings concerning the child. The qualified expert witness should be someone familiar with the particular child and have contact with the parents to observe interaction between the parents, child, and extended family members. The child welfare agency and courts should facilitate access to the family and records to facilitate accurate testimony.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.

27-20.2-16.
Order of adjudication — Noncriminal.

An order of disposition or other adjudication in a proceeding under this chapter is not a conviction of crime and does not impose any civil disability ordinarily resulting from a conviction or operate to disqualify the child in any civil service application or appointment. A child may not be committed or transferred to a penal institution or other facility used primarily for the execution of sentences of individuals convicted of a crime.

The disposition of a child and evidence adduced in a hearing in juvenile court may not be used against the child in any proceeding in any court other than a juvenile court, whether before or after reaching majority, except for impeachment or in dispositional proceedings after conviction of a felony for the purposes of a presentence investigation and report.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 245, § 22, effective July 1, 2021.